Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.040

Manner of selection and terms of transferred board members not affected.

This chapter shall not affect the manner for selecting members of the boards affected by RCW 41.50.030, nor shall it affect the terms of any members serving on such boards.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 6.]